de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Bowling > Bowlingtaschen: Bowlingball-Zubehörtaschen; Bowlingball-Rucksäcke; Bowlingball-Trolleys; Bowlingball-Tragetaschen
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Bowling > Borse per palle da bowling: Borse aggiuntive per palle da bowling; Zaini per palle da bowling; Trolley per palle da bowling; Borse tote per palle da bowling
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Bowling > Torbe za žoge za bowling: Dodatne torbe za žoge za bowling; Nahrbtniki za žoge za bowling; Torbe na kolescih za žoge za bowling; Torbe z ročaji za žoge za bowling
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 볼링 > 볼링공 가방: 볼링공 추가 가방; 볼링공 백팩; 볼링공 롤러백; 볼링공 토트백
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Boliche > Sacos de bolas de boliche: Bolsas de complemento para bolas de boliche; Mochilas para bolas de boliche; Malas de rodinhas para bolas de boliche; Sacolas para bolas de boliche
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Bowling > Bowlinggolyó-táskák: Bowlinggolyó-kiegészítő táskák; Bowlinggolyó-hátizsákok; Gurulós bowlinggolyó-táskák; Bowlinggolyó-hordtáskák
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 保龄球用品 > 保龄球袋: 保龄球附加包; 保龄球背包; 保龄球拉杆包; 保龄球手提包
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Bowling > Sacs de boules de bowling: Sacs d’extension pour boules de bowling; Sacs à dos pour boules de bowling; Sacs à roulettes pour boules de bowling; Sacs fourre-tout pour boules de bowling
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Bowling > Bowling Ball Bags: Bowling Ball Add-On Bags; Bowling Ball Backpacks; Bowling Ball Roller Bags; Bowling Ball Tote Bags
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Bowling > Tašky na bowlingové gule: Tašky na bowlingové gule; Batohy na bowlingové gule; Tašky na kolieskach na bowlingové gule; Tašky s motívom bowlingovej gule
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Bowling > Bowlingbaltassen: Bowlingbal-uitbreidingstassen; Bowlingbalrugzakken; Bowlingbaltassen op wielen; Bowlingbaldraagtassen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Боулинг > Чанти за топки за боулинг: Допълнителни чанти за боулинг топки; Раници за топки за боулинг; Чанти с колелца за боулинг топки; Торби за топки за боулинг
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Bowling > Sacos para bolas de bilhar: Sacos suplementares para bolas de bowling; Mochilas para bolas de bowling; Sacos com rodas para bolas de bowling; Sacos de desporto para bolas de bowling
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Kuglanje > Torbe za kugle za kuglanje: Dodaci za torbe za kugle za kuglanje; Ruksaci za kuglu za kuglanje; Torba s kotačima za kugle za kuglanje; Torbe na jedno rame za kugle za kuglanje
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Bowling > Tašky na bowlingové koule: Doplňkové bowlingové tašky; Bowlingové batohy; Bowlingové tašky na kolečkách; Bowlingové tašky přes rameno
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Keilailu > Keilapallokassit: Keilapallojen lisälaukut; Keilapalloreput; Keilapallojen vetolaukut; Keilapallokassit
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Kręglarstwo > Pokrowce na kule do kręgli: Doczepiane torby na kule do kręgli (add-on); Plecaki na kule do kręgli; Torby na kółkach na kule do kręgli; Torby na kule do kręgli
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Боулинг > Сумки для шаров для боулинга: Дополнительные сумки для шаров для боулинга; Рюкзаки для шаров для боулинга; Сумки на колесах для шаров для боулинга; Сумки-тоут для шаров для боулинга
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > โบว์ลิ่ง > ถุงใส่ลูกโบว์ลิ่ง: กระเป๋าส่วนขยายลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; กระเป๋าเป้ลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; กระเป๋าลากลูกโบว์ลิ่ง; กระเป๋าหิ้วลูกโบว์ลิ่ง
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Μπόουλινγκ > Τσάντες για μπάλες μπόουλινγκ: Πρόσθετες τσάντες μπαλών μπόουλινγκ; Σακίδια πλάτης μπαλών μπόουλινγκ; Τσάντες με ροδάκια για μπάλες μπόουλινγκ; Τσάντες tote μπαλών μπόουλινγκ
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bowling > Bowlingklotväskor: Tilläggsväskor för bowlingklot; Ryggsäckar för bowlingklot; Rullväskor för bowlingklot; Tygväskor för bowlingklot
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Bowling > Huse pentru mingi de bowling: Genți suplimentare pentru mingi de bowling; Rucsacuri pentru mingi de bowling; Genți cu rotile pentru bile de bowling; Genți de mână pentru bile de bowling
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > ボウリング > ボウリングバッグ: ボウリングボール用アドオンバッグ; ボウリングボール用バックパック; ボウリングボール用ローラーバッグ; ボウリングボール用トートバッグ
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Bowling > Túi đựng bóng bowling: Túi phụ đựng bóng bowling; Balo đựng bóng bowling; Vali kéo đựng bóng bowling; Túi xách đựng bóng bowling
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 保齡球 > 保齡球袋: 保齡球外掛袋; 保齡球後背包; 保齡球拉桿袋; 保齡球手提袋
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Bowling > Bowlingkulevesker: Tilleggsvesker for bowlingballer; Ryggsekker for bowlingballer; Rullebager for bowlingballer; Bærevesker for bowlingballer
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Boulingas > Boulingo kamuolių krepšiai: Boulingo kamuoliukų priedų krepšiai; Boulingo kamuoliukų kuprinės; Boulingo kamuolių krepšiai su ratukais; Boulingo kamuolių nešiojimo krepšiai
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Bowling > Bowling Top Çantaları: Bowling topu eklenti çantaları; Bowling topu sırt çantaları; Tekerlekli bowling topu çantaları; Bowling topu taşıma çantaları
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Bolos > Bolsas para bolas de bowling: Bolsos adicionales para bolas de bolos; Mochilas para bolas de bolos; Bolsos con ruedas para bolas de bolos; Bolsos tote para bolas de bolos
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Bowling > Tasker til bowlingkugler: Tilføjelsestasker til bowlingbolde; Rygsække til bowlingbolde; Rulletasker til bowlingbolde; Bæretasker til bowlingbolde